Washington statutes.
RCW 26.25.020

Cooperative agreements—Authorized.

(1) The department of social and health services may enter into an agreement with an Indian tribe or tribal organization, which is within the state's borders and recognized by the federal government, for joint or cooperative action on child support services and child support enforcement.

(2) In determining the scope and terms of the agreement, the department and the tribe should consider, among other factors, whether the tribe has an established tribal court system with the authority to establish, modify, or enforce support orders, establish paternity, or enter support orders in accordance with child support guidelines established by the tribe.

[ 1997 c 386 s 61.]